Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [148.781] CENTRAL SERVICE TECHNICIAN. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin This section applies to persons who perform the functions of a central service technician in a health care facility. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "central service technician" means a person who decontaminates, inspects, assembles, packages, and sterilizes reusable medical instruments or devices being used by a health care facility; new text end new text begin (2) "health care practitioner" means a person licensed or registered under this chapter and chapters 150A, 153, 153B, 154, 155A, and 156, including any intern, resident, fellow, or medical officer who conducts or assists with the performance of surgery; and new text end new text begin (3) "health care facility" means a hospital or ambulatory surgery center. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Requirements for central service technician. new text end new text begin (a) A health care facility shall employ or otherwise retain the services of a central service technician only if the central service technician: new text end new text begin (1) has successfully passed a nationally accredited central service exam for central service technicians and holds and maintains credentials administered by a nationally accredited central service technician credentialing organization, a certified registered central service technician credential, a certified endoscope reprocessor credential, a certified sterile processing and distribution technician credential, or a certified flexible endoscope reprocessor credential; or new text end new text begin (2) provides evidence that the person was employed by or was retained as a central service technician by a health care facility on or before December 31, 2027. new text end new text begin (b) A central service technician who does not meet the requirements of paragraph (a), clause (1), shall have 18 months from the date of hire to obtain a certified registered central service technician credential, a certified endoscope reprocessor credential, a certified sterile processing and distribution technician credential, or a certified flexible endoscope reprocessor credential. new text end new text begin (c) A person who qualifies to operate as a central service technician in a health care facility under paragraph (a) must annually complete ten hours of continuing education credits to remain qualified to operate as a central service technician. The continuing education required under this paragraph must be related to the functions of a central service technician. new text end new text begin (d) Nothing in this subdivision shall prohibit the following persons from performing the tasks or functions of a central service technician: new text end new text begin (1) a health care practitioner; new text end new text begin (2) a person who holds or maintains a registration, certification, or license by a nationally accredited credentialing organization to perform health care services; or new text end new text begin (3) a student or intern performing the functions of a central service technician under the direct supervision of a health care practitioner as part of the student's or intern's training or internship. new text end new text begin (e) A health care facility shall, upon the written request of a central service technician, verify in writing the central service technician's dates of employment or the contract period during which the central service technician provided services to the health care facility. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective 180 days after final enactment. new text end